District of Columbia statutes.
26-131.03

Establishment of an automated teller machine or point-of-sale terminal.

(a)

A District bank, federal bank, District credit union, or federal credit union may establish in the District, and operate on a transaction fee basis, an automated teller machine. A District bank or a District credit union may establish and operate outside of the District an automated teller machine.

(b)

An out-of-state bank that maintains a branch in the District or an out-of-state credit union that maintains a subsidiary office in the District may establish and operate on a transaction fee basis an automated teller machine in the District.

(c)

A District bank, federal bank, out-of-state bank, District credit union, federal credit union, out-of-state credit union, or other person may establish and operate a point-of-sale terminal in the District.

June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-308, § 503, 48 DCR 3244